Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.120

Fine constitutes lien.

Whenever the owner of a building or unit within a building upon which the act or acts constituting the contempt have been committed, or the owner of any interest in the building or unit has been found in contempt of court, and fined in any proceedings under this chapter, the fine is a lien upon the building or unit within a building to the extent of the owner's interest. The lien is enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court.

[ 1989 c 373 s 10; 1988 c 141 s 15.]